Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-408 Attachment, garnishment and
levy of execution. During the pendency in this or any other state of a
liquidation proceeding, whether called by that name or not, no action or
proceeding in the nature of an attachment, garnishment or levy of execution
shall be commenced or maintained in this State against the delinquent insurer
or its assets. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next